Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6131
Appeal; procedure.

Any person affected by a final order issued pursuant to the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act shall have the right to appeal such order to the district court of Lancaster County. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.